Nebraska, session 109, LB629.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB629 LB629
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be known and may
be cited as the County Initiative and Referendum Act.
(2) The powers of initiative and referendum are hereby reserved to
the qualified electors of each county in the state. The County Initiative
and Referendum Act shall govern the use of initiative to enact and the
use of referendum to amend or repeal measures affecting the governance of
all counties in the state.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the County Initiative and Referendum Act:
(1) Circulator means any person who solicits signatures for an
initiative or referendum petition; and
(2) Measure means any ordinance, charter provision, or resolution
which is within the legislative authority of the county board of a county
to pass and which is not excluded from the operation of referendum by any
exception in the County Initiative and Referendum Act. Measure does not
include any action permitted by the Nebraska Advantage Transformational
Tourism and Redevelopment Act.
-2-